de: Geschmack: Mandel; Apple; Banane; Blaubeere; Karamell; Kirsche; Schokolade; Zimt; Kokosnuss; Kaffee; Dulce de leche; Holunder; Ingwer; Zitrone; Limette; Litschi; Mango; Matcha; Minze; Mojito; Orange; Pfirsich; Himbeere; Rose; Gesalzenes Karamell; Erdbeere; Tropisch; Geschmacksneutral; Vanille; Sonstiges
vi: Hương vị: Mũi giày quả hạnh; Táo; Chuối; Việt quất; Caramel; Anh đào; Sô cô la; Quế; Dừa; Cà phê; Mứt sữa; Hoa cơm cháy; Gừng; Chanh vàng; Chanh xanh; Vải thiều; Xoài; Trà xanh; Bạc hà; Mojito; Vang cam; Đào; Mâm xôi đỏ; Hình hoa hồng; Caramel muối; Dâu tây; Nhiệt đới; Không có hương vị; Vani; Khác
es: Sabor: Almendra; Manzana; Plátano; Arándano; Caramelo; Cereza; Chocolate; Canela; Coco; Café; Dulce de leche; Flor de saúco; Jengibre; Limón; Lima; Lichi; Mango; Matcha; Menta; Mojito; Naranja; Melocotón; Frambuesa; Rosa; Caramelo salado; Fresa; Tropical; Sin sabor; Vainilla; Otros
ko: 맛: 아몬드; 사과; 바나나; 블루베리; 캐러멜; 체리; 초콜릿; 시나몬; 코코넛; 커피; 둘세 데 레체; 엘더플라워; 생강; 레몬; 라임; 리치; 망고; 말차; 민트; 모히또; 오렌지; 피치; 라즈베리; 장미; 솔티드 캐러멜; 딸기; 열대; 무향; 바닐라; 기타
hu: Aroma: Mandula; Alma; Banán; Áfonya; Karamell; Cseresznye; Csokoládé; Fahéj; Kókusz; Kávé; Dulce de leche; Bodzavirág; Gyömbér; Citrom; Lime; Licsi; Mangó; Matcha; Menta; Mojito; Narancs; Őszibarack; Málna; Rózsa; Sós karamell; Eper; Trópusi; Ízesítés nélküli; Vanília; Egyéb
fi: Maku: Manteli; Omena; Banaani; Mustikka; Karamelli; Kirsikka; Suklaa; Kaneli; Kookos; Kahvi; Dulce de leche; Seljankukka; Inkivääri; Sitruuna; Lime; Litsi; Mango; Matcha; Minttu; Mojito; Oranssi; Persikka; Vadelma; Ruusu; Suolattu karamelli; Mansikka; Trooppinen; Maustamaton; Vanilja; Muu
tr: Lezzet: Badem burun; Elma; Muz; Yaban mersini; Karamel; Kiraz; Çikolata; Tarçın; Hindistan cevizi; Kahve; Karamelize süt; Mürver çiçeği; Zencefil; Limon; Yeşil limon; Çin kirazı; Mango; Matcha; Nane; Mojito; Turuncu; Şeftali; Ahududu; Gül; Tuzlu karamel; Çilek; Tropikal; Aromasız; Vanilya; Diğer
sv: Smak: Mandel; Äpple; Banan; Blåbär; Kola; Körsbär; Choklad; Kanel; Kokos; Kaffe; Dulce de leche; Fläder; Ingefära; Citron; Lime; Litchi; Mango; Matcha; Mynta; Mojito; Apelsin; Persika; Hallon; Rosfärgad; Saltad karamell; Jordgubbe; Tropisk; Ej smaksatt; Vanilj; Annat
el: Γεύση: Αμυγδαλέλαιο; Μήλο; Μπανάνα; Μύρτιλο; Καραμέλα; Κεράσι; Σοκολάτα; Κανέλα; Λάδι καρύδας; Καφές; Dulce de leche; Σαμπούκος; Τζίντζερ; Λεμόνι; Λάιμ; Λίτσι; Μάνγκο; Μάτσα; Μέντα; Μοχίτο; Πορτοκάλι; Ροδάκινο; Σμέουρο; Τριαντάφυλλο; Αλατισμένη καραμέλα; Φράουλα; Τροπικό; Χωρίς γεύση; Βανίλια; Άλλο
bg-BG: Аромат: Бадем; Ябълка; Банан; Боровинка; Карамел; Череша; Шоколад; Канела; Кокос; Кафе; Дулсе де лече; Бъзов цвят; Джинджифил; Лимон; Лайм; Личи; Манго; Матча; Мента; Мохито; Портокал; Праскова; Малина; Роза; Солен карамел; Ягода; Тропически; Неовкусен; Ванилия; Други
sk-SK: Príchuť: Mandľa; Jablko; Banán; Čučoriedka; Karamel; Čerešňa; Čokoláda; Škorica; Kokos; Káva; Dulce de leche; Bazový kvet; Zázvor; Citrón; Limetka; Liči; Mango; Matcha; Mäta; Mojito; Oranžový; Broskyňa; Malina; Rose; Slaný karamel; Jahoda; Tropický; Neochutený; Vanilka; Iné
ru: Вкус: Миндаль; Яблоко; Банан; Голубика; Карамель; Вишня; Шоколад; Корица; Кокос; Кофе; Вареное сгущенное молоко; Бузина; Имбирь; Лимон; Лайм; Личи; Манго; Матча; Мята; Мохито; Апельсин; Персик; Малина; Роза; Соленая карамель; Клубника; Тропический; Без ароматизаторов; Ваниль; Другой
lt-LT: Skonis: Migdolai; Obuoliai; Bananai; Mėlynės; Karamelė; Vyšnios; Šokoladas; Cinamonas; Kokosai; Kava; Dulce de leche; Šeivamedžio žiedai; Imbieras; Citrina; Žalioji citrina; Ličiai; Mangai; Mača; Mėtos; Mojito; Apelsinai; Persikas; Avietės; Rožės; Sūdyta karamelė; Braškės; Tropinis; Nepagardintas; Vanilė; Kita
pl: Aromat: Migdał; Jabłko; Banan; Borówka; Karmel; Wiśnia; Czekolada; Cynamon; Kokos; Kawa; Kajmak; Elderflower; Imbir; Cytryna; Limonka; Liczi; Mango; Matcha; Mięta; Mojito; Pomarańcza; Brzoskwinia; Jasnofioletowy; Róża; Słony karmel; Truskawka; Tropikalny; Niearomatyzowany; Wanilia; Pozostałe
sl-SI: Okus: Mandelj; Jabolko; Banana; Borovnica; Karamela; Češnja; Čokolada; Cimet; Kokos; Kava; Dulce de leche; Bezgovo cvetje; Ingver; Limona; Limeta; Liči; Mango; Matcha; Meta; Mojito; Pomaranča; Breskev; Malina; Vrtnica; Slana karamela; Jagoda; Tropski; Brez okusa; Vanilija; Drugo
fr: Saveur: Amande; Pomme; Banane; Myrtille; Caramel; Cerise; Chocolat; Cannelle; Noix de coco; Café; Confiture de lait; Fleur de sureau; Gingembre; Citron; Citron vert; Litchi; Mangue; Matcha; Menthe; Mojito; Orange; Pêche; Framboise; Pomme; Caramel salé; Fraise; Tropical; Sans saveur; Vanille; Autre
ja: フレーバー: アーモンド; アップル; バナナ; ブルーベリー; キャラメル; チェリー; チョコレート; シナモン; ココナッツ; コーヒー; ドゥルセ・デ・レチェ; エルダーフラワー; ショウガ; レモン; ライム; ライチ; マンゴー; 抹茶; ミント; モヒート; オレンジ; 桃; ラズベリー; ローズ; 塩キャラメル; いちご; トロピカル; ノンフレーバー; バニラ; その他
th: รสชาติ: อัลมอนด์; แอปเปิล; กล้วย; บลูเบอร์รี; รสคาราเมล; เชอร์รี; ช็อกโกแลต; อบเชย; มะพร้าว; กาแฟ; ดุลเซ่ เด เลเช่; เอลเดอร์ฟลาเวอร์; ขิง; เลมอน; มะนาว; ลิ้นจี่; มะม่วง; มัทฉะ; มินต์; โมฮิโต; ส้ม; ลูกพีช; ราสเบอร์รี; กุหลาบ; คาราเมลเค็ม; สตรอว์เบอร์รี; ปลาเขตร้อน; ไม่ปรุงแต่ง; วานิลลา; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Sabor: Ponta arredondada; Maçã; Banana; Mirtilo; Caramelo; Cereja; Chocolate; Canela; Coco; Café; Doce de leite; Sabugueiro; Gengibre; Limão; Lima; Lichia; Manga; Matcha; Hortelã; Mojito; Laranja; Pêssego; Framboesa; Rosa; Caramelo salgado; Morango; Tropical; Sem sabor; Baunilha; Outro
da: Smag: Mandel; Æble; Banan; Blåbær; Karamel; Kirsebær; Chokolade; Kanel; Kokosnød; Kaffe; Dulce de leche; Hyldeblomst; Ingefær; Citron; Lime; Litchi; Mango; Matcha; Mint; Mojito; Orange; Fersken; Hindbær; Rose; Saltkaramel; Jordbær; Tropisk; Uden smag; Vanilje; Andet
nb: Smak: Mandel; Eple; Banan; Blåbær; Karamell; Kirsebær; Sjokolade; Kanel; Kokosnøtt; Kaffe; Dulce de leche; Hylleblomst; Ingefær; Sitron; Lime; Litchi; Mango; Matcha; Mynte; Mojito; Oransje; Fersken; Bringebær; Rose; Saltet karamell; Jordbær; Tropisk; Ikke smaksatt; Vanilje; Annen
zh-TW: 口味: 杏仁; 蘋果; 香蕉; 藍莓; 焦糖; 櫻桃; 巧克力; 肉桂; 椰子; 咖啡; 牛奶焦糖; 接骨木花; 薑; 檸檬; 萊姆; 荔枝; 芒果; 抹茶; 薄荷; 莫希托; 橙; 桃; 覆盆子; 玫瑰; 海鹽焦糖; 草莓; 熱帶; 無味; 香草; 其他
hr-HR: Okus: Badem; Jabuka; Banana; Borovnica; Karamel; Trešnja; Čokolada; Cimet; Kokos; Kava; Dulce de leche; Cvijet bazge; Đumbir; Limun; Limeta; Liči; Mango; Matcha; Metvica; Mojito; Naranča; Breskva; Malina; Ruža; Slani karamel; Jagoda; Tropski; Bez okusa; Vanilija; Ostalo
nl: Smaak: Amandel; Appel; Banaan; Bosbes; Karamel; Kers; Chocolade; Kaneel; Kokosnoot; Koffie; Dulce de leche; Vlierbloesem; Gember; Citroen; Limoen; Lychee; Mango; Matcha; Munt; Mojito; Oranje; Perzik; Framboos; Rozenrood; Gezouten karamel; Aardbei; Tropisch; Smaakloos; Vanille; Andere
zh-CN: 风味: 杏仁; 苹果; 香蕉; 蓝莓; 焦糖; 樱桃; 巧克力; 肉桂; 椰子; 咖啡; 牛奶焦糖; 接骨木花; 姜; 柠檬; 酸橙; 荔枝; 芒果; 抹茶; 薄荷; 莫吉托; 橙酒; 桃红色; 覆盆子; 玫瑰型; 咸焦糖; 草莓; 热带; 无味; 香草; 其他
en: Flavor: Almond; Apple; Banana; Blueberry; Caramel; Cherry; Chocolate; Cinnamon; Coconut; Coffee; Dulce de leche; Elderflower; Ginger; Lemon; Lime; Lychee; Mango; Matcha; Mint; Mojito; Orange; Peach; Raspberry; Rose; Salted caramel; Strawberry; Tropical; Unflavored; Vanilla; Other
it: Gusto: Mandorla; Mela; Banana; Mirtillo; Caramello; Ciliegia; Cioccolato; Cannella; Cocco; Caffè; Dulce de leche; Fiori di sambuco; Zenzero; Limone; Lime; Litchi; Mango; Matcha; Menta; Mojito; Arancia; Pesca; Lampone; Rosa; Caramello salato; Fragola; Tropicale; Non aromatizzato; Vaniglia; Altro
cs: Příchuť: Mandle; Apple; Banán; Borůvka; Karamelový; Třešeň; Čokoláda; Skořice; Kokos; Káva; Dulce de leche; Bezový květ; Zázvor; Citrón; Limetka; Liči; Mango; Matcha; Máta; Mojito; Oranžové; Broskev; Malina; Růžice; Slaný karamel; Jahoda; Tropické; Neochucené; Vanilka; Jiné
pt-PT: Sabor: Amêndoa; Maçã; Banana; Mirtilo; Caramelos; Cereja; Chocolate; Canela; Coco; Café; Doce de leite; Elderflower; Gengibre; Limão; Lima; Líchia; Manga; Matcha; Menta; Mojito; Laranja; Pêssego; Framboesa; Rosa; Caramelo salgado; Morango; Tropical; Sem sabor; Baunilha; Outro
ro-RO: Aromă: Migdale; Măr; Banană; Afine; Caramel; Cireșe; Ciocolată; Scorțișoară; Cocos; Cafea; Dulce de leche; Floare de soc; Ghimbir; Lămâie; Limetă; Litchi; Mango; Matcha; Mentă; Mojito; Portocaliu; Piersică; Zmeură; Trandafir; Caramel sărat; Căpșuni; Tropical; Fără aromă; Vanilie; Altele